Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-318
Levees; dikes; assessments; notice.

Within ten days after such work has been completed and approved by the board, the board shall cause a notice to all persons whose lands are benefited by such improvement to be published for three successive weeks in a legal newspaper published and of general circulation in such county or, if no legal newspaper is published in the county, in a legal newspaper of general circulation in the county. Such notice shall fix the time, not more than sixty days from the date of the completion and approval of the work, within which owners of real estate benefited may pay the entire amount assessed against the respective parcels of land benefited and shall state that unless the amount is paid within such time, bonds will be issued for the payment of the special benefits assessed as hereinafter provided.

Laws 1921, c. 269, § 10, p. 897;

C.S.1922, § 1035;

C.S.1929, § 26-729;

R.S.1943, § 23-318;

Laws 1986, LB 960, § 19.